Hawaii statutes.
[§431:2-301.6] Conflict of interest.
(a) No examiner may be appointed by the commissioner if the examiner, either
directly or indirectly, has a conflict of interest or is affiliated with the
management of or owns a pecuniary interest in any person subject to examination
under this part. This section shall not be construed to automatically preclude
an examiner from being:

(1) A policyholder or claimant under an insurance
policy;

(2) A grantor of a mortgage or similar instrument on
the examiner's residence to a regulated entity if done under customary terms
and in the ordinary course of business;

(3) An investment owner in shares of regulated
diversified investment companies; or

(4) A settlor or beneficiary of a "blind
trust" into which any otherwise impermissible holdings have been placed.

(b) Notwithstanding the requirements of this
section, the commissioner may retain from time to time, on an individual basis,
qualified actuaries, certified public accountants, or other similar individuals
who are independently practicing their professions, even though those persons
from time to time may be similarly employed or retained by persons subject to
examination under the insurance code. [L 1993, c 321, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next